Maryland, session 2025, HB0837.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Task Force to Study Forced Infant Separation From Incarcerated
Individuals.
(b) The Task Force consists of the following members:
(1) one member of the Senate, appointed by the President of the Senate;
(2) one member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
(3) the Secretary of Public Safety and Correctional Services, or the
Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Public Defender, or the Public Defender’s designee; and
(5) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
(i) one formerly incarcerated individual;
(ii) one family member of a currently incarcerated male individual;
(iii) one family member of a currently incarcerated female individual;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0837*

HOUSE BILL 837
(iv) three representatives of a nonprofit organization focused on
women’s health;
(v) three representatives of a nonprofit organization focused on
pediatric health; and
(vi) three representatives of a nonprofit organization focused on the
rights of incarcerated individuals.
(c) The Executive Director of the Governor’s Office of Crime Prevention and
Policy shall designate the chair of the Task Force.
(d) The Governor’s Office of Crime Prevention and Policy shall provide staff for
the Task Force.
(e) A member of the Task Force:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Task Force; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Task Force shall study:
(1) the number of pregnant and postpartum incarcerated individuals in the
State’s prisons;
(2) the ability of the Division of Correction to create a space within the
prerelease unit, when completed, for pregnant and postpartum incarcerated individuals;
(3) the impact of forced infant separation from the infant’s mother;
(4) the best practices of other state correctional systems in handling:
(i) forced infant separation;
(ii) pregnant and postpartum incarcerated individuals; and
(iii) visitation between postpartum incarcerated individuals and
their children; and
(5) any other issues that the Task Force considers relevant.
(g) The Task Force shall make legislative recommendations regarding methods
to reduce forced infant separation in the State and facilitate bonds between postpartum
incarcerated individuals and their children.

HOUSE BILL 837 3
(h) On or before December 31, 2026, the Task Force shall report its findings and
recommendations, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the
General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and, at the end of June 30, 2027,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.